Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 5 Beer and Wine — Manufacture, Sale, and Transportation Generally
Subchapter 11

— Beer — Wholesalers and Suppliers

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1991, Nos. 8 and 866, § 15, provided:

“All laws or parts of laws which conflict with this Act or which are inconsistent with this Act as it relates to beer wholesalers are hereby repealed.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1991, Nos. 8 and 866, § 16: Jan. 31, 1991 and Mar. 29, 1991, respectively. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that present law does not adequately protect wholesalers of beer and light wine from arbitrary actions of suppliers; that this Act provides such protection; and that until this Act goes into effect the Arkansas wholesalers will be susceptible to arbitrary actions of the suppliers. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2015, No. 857, § 12: Mar. 31, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act is essential to the public interest and operation of the alcohol laws in the State of Arkansas; that this act eliminates conflicting language and allows consistent application of alcohol laws; that this act is immediately necessary due to the substantial growth and continued expansion of the brewing industry in Arkansas; that clear and consistent application of the law to the brewing industry is in the public’s immediate interest as is controlling the distribution of alcoholic beverages within the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-5-1101. Legislative intent and purpose.

(a)

The legislative intent and purpose of this subchapter is to provide a structure for the business relations between a wholesaler and a supplier of beer.

(b)

Regulation in this area is considered necessary for the following reasons:

(1)

To maintain stability and healthy competition in the beer industry in this state;

(2)

To promote and maintain a sound, stable, and viable three-tier system of distribution of beer to the public; and

(3)

To promote the public health, safety, and welfare.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 8, § 1; 1991, No. 866, § 1.

3-5-1102. Definitions.

(a)

The following words or phrases, or the plural thereof, whenever they appear in this subchapter shall have, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the meanings ascribed to them in this section:

(1)

“Agreement” means any agreement between a wholesaler and a supplier, whether oral or written, whereby a wholesaler is granted the right to purchase and sell a brand or brands of beer sold by a supplier;

(2)

“Ancillary business” means:

(A)

A business owned by the wholesaler, by a substantial stockholder of a wholesaler, or by a substantial partner of a wholesaler the primary business of which is directly related to the transporting, storing, or marketing of the brand or brands of beer of a supplier with whom the wholesaler has an agreement; or

(B)

A business owned by a wholesaler, a substantial stockholder of a wholesaler, or a substantial partner of a wholesaler which recycles empty beverage containers of the supplier;

(3)

“Beer” includes light wine and shall carry the same definitions as set forth in §3-5-202(1) and (7);

(4)

“Designated member” means and includes:

(A)

The spouse, child, grandchild, parent, brother, or sister of a deceased individual who owned an interest, including a controlling interest, in a wholesaler;

(B)

Any person who inherits under the deceased individual's will or under the laws of intestate succession of this state;

(C)

Any person or entity which has through a valid testamentary device by the deceased individual succeeded the deceased individual's ownership interest in the wholesaler pursuant to a written contract or instrument which has been previously approved by a supplier;

(D)

The appointed and qualified personal representative and the testamentary trustee of a deceased individual owning an ownership interest in a wholesaler; and

(E)

The person appointed by a court as the guardian or conservator of the property of an incapacitated individual owning an ownership interest in a wholesaler;

(5)

“Director” means the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division;

(6)

“Good faith” means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing in the trade, as defined in and interpreted under the Uniform Commercial Code, §4-1-101 et seq.;

(7)

“Reasonable qualifications” means the standard of the reasonable criteria established and consistently used by the respective supplier for similarly situated wholesalers that entered into, continued, or renewed an agreement with the supplier during a period of twenty-four (24) months prior to the proposed transfer of the wholesaler's business, or for similarly situated wholesalers who have changed managers or designated managers during a period of twenty-four (24) months prior to the proposed change in the manager or successor manager of the wholesaler's business;

(8)

“Retaliatory action” means the refusal to continue an agreement, or a material reduction in the quality of service or quantity of products available to a wholesaler under an agreement, which refusal or reduction is not made in good faith;

(9)

“Sales territory” means an area of exclusive sales responsibility for the brand or brands of beer sold by a supplier as designated by an agreement;

(10)

“Similarly situated wholesalers” means wholesalers of a supplier that are of a generally comparable size, and operate in markets with similar demographic characteristics, including population size, density, distribution, and vital statistics, as well as reasonably similar economic and geographic conditions;

(11)

“Substantial stockholder or substantial partner” means a stockholder of or partner in the wholesaler who owns an interest of ten percent (10%) or more of the partnership or of the capital stock of a corporate wholesaler;

(12)

“Successor” means a person who replaces a supplier with regard to the right to manufacture, sell, or import beer;

(13)

“Supplier” means a manufacturer or importer of beer and light wine brands as registered with the director;

(14)

“Transfer of wholesaler's business” means the voluntary sale, assignment, or other transfer of ten percent (10%) or more or control of the business or all or substantially all of the assets of the wholesaler, or ten percent (10%) or more or control of the capital stock of the wholesaler, including, without limitation, the sale or other transfer of capital stock or assets by merger, consolidation, or dissolution, or of the capital stock of the parent corporation, or of the capital stock or beneficial ownership of any other entity owning or controlling the wholesaler; and

(15)

“Wholesaler” means a wholesaler of beer and light wine as licensed by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board and as defined in §3-5-202(12).

(b)

Other words and phrases used in this subchapter shall have the meanings ascribed to them in §§3-1-102 and3-5-202, as amended, and any acts amendatory thereof, supplementary thereto, or substituted therefor unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 8, § 2; 1991, No. 866, § 2; 2011, No. 982, § 1; 2015, No. 857, §§ 2, 3.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment inserted present (a)(12)(B).

The 2015 amendment, in the definition of “Supplier”, deleted (B); and added the definition of “Successor”.

3-5-1103. Applicability of subchapter to future agreements — Transferee continues under agreement.

(a)

This subchapter shall apply to agreements entered into or renewed after January 31, 1991.

(b)(1)

A transferee of a wholesaler that continues in business as a wholesaler shall have the benefit of and be bound by all terms and conditions of the agreement with the supplier in effect on the date of the transfer.

(2)

However, a transfer of a wholesaler's business which requires the supplier's consent or approval but is disapproved by the supplier shall be null and void.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 8, § 9; 1991, No. 866, § 9.

3-5-1104. Subchapter cumulative.

This subchapter is cumulative, and supplements and is in addition to Title 3 of this Code and the Arkansas Franchise Practices Act, §4-72-201 et seq., as amended.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 8, § 12; 1991, No. 866, § 12.

3-5-1105. Waiver of rights.

(a)(1)

A wholesaler may not waive any of the rights granted in any provision of this subchapter, and the provisions of any agreement which would have such an effect shall be null and void.

(2)

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to limit or prohibit good faith dispute settlements voluntarily entered into by the parties.

(b)

No right or cause of action authorized by Arkansas law shall be waived by the supplier or wholesaler unless specifically waived in the agreement.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 8, §§ 8, 11; 1991, No. 866, §§ 8, 11.

3-5-1106. Civil action for violations — Damages — Venue.

(a)

If a supplier or wholesaler engages in conduct prohibited under this subchapter, a wholesaler with which the supplier has an agreement may maintain a civil action against the supplier to recover actual damages reasonably incurred as the result of the prohibited conduct.

(b)

A supplier or wholesaler that violates any provision of this subchapter shall be liable for all actual damages and all court costs and, in the court's discretion, reasonable attorney's fees incurred by a wholesaler as a result of that violation.

(c)

A supplier or wholesaler may bring an action for declaratory judgment for determination of any controversy arising pursuant to this subchapter.

(d)

Upon proper application to the court, a supplier or wholesaler may obtain injunctive relief against any violation of this subchapter.

(e)

Any legal action taken under this subchapter or in a dispute over the provisions of an agreement, shall be filed in a court, state or federal, located in Arkansas, which state court is located in or which federal court has jurisdiction and venue of the county in which the wholesaler maintains its principal place of business in this state.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 8, § 10; 1991, No. 866, § 10.

3-5-1107. Prohibited acts by supplier.

(a)

A supplier shall not do the following:

(1)

Fail to provide to each wholesaler of the supplier's brand or brands with a written agreement which contains, in total, the supplier's agreement with each wholesaler and designates a specific exclusive sales territory. Any agreement which is in existence on January 31, 1991, shall be renewed consistent with this subchapter, provided that this subchapter may be incorporated by reference in the agreement. Provided, however, nothing contained herein shall prevent a supplier from appointing, one (1) time for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days, a wholesaler to temporarily service a sales territory not designated to another wholesaler, until such time as a wholesaler is appointed by the supplier; and such wholesaler who is designated to service the sales territory during this period of temporary service shall not be in violation of this subchapter, and, with respect to the temporary service territory, shall not have any of the rights provided under §§3-5-1108 and3-5-1111;

(2)

Fix, maintain, or establish the price at which a wholesaler shall sell any beer;

(3)

Enter into an additional agreement with any other wholesaler for, or to sell to any other wholesaler, the same brand or brands of beer in the same territory or any portion thereof, or to sell directly to any retailer in this state;

(4)

Require any wholesaler to accept delivery of any beer or other commodity which has not been ordered by the wholesaler. Provided, however, a supplier may impose reasonable inventory requirements upon a wholesaler if the requirements are made in good faith and are generally applied to other similarly situated wholesalers who have an agreement with the supplier;

(5)

Require any wholesaler to accept delivery of any beer or other commodity ordered by a wholesaler if the order was properly cancelled by the wholesaler in accordance with the supplier's procedures;

(6)

Require any wholesaler to do any illegal act or to violate any law or regulation by threatening to amend, modify, cancel, terminate, or refuse to renew any agreement existing between the supplier and wholesaler;

(7)

Require a wholesaler to assent to any condition, stipulation, or provision limiting the wholesaler's right to sell the brand or brands of beer of any other supplier unless the acquisition of the brand or brands of another supplier would materially impair or adversely affect the wholesaler's quality of service, sales, or ability to compete effectively in representing the brand or brands of the supplier presently being sold by the wholesaler; provided the supplier shall have the burden of proving that such acquisition of such other brand or brands would have such effect;

(8)

Require a wholesaler to purchase one (1) or more brands of beer products in order for the wholesaler to purchase another brand or brands of beer for any reason. Provided, however, a wholesaler that has agreed to distribute a brand or brands before January 31, 1991, shall continue to distribute the brand or brands in conformance with this subchapter;

(9)

Require a wholesaler to submit audited profit and loss statements, balance sheets, or financial records as a condition of renewal or continuation of an agreement;

(10)

Withhold delivery of beer ordered by a wholesaler, or change a wholesaler's quota of a brand or brands if the withholding or change is not made in good faith;

(11)

Require a wholesaler by any means directly to participate in or contribute to any local or national advertising fund controlled directly or indirectly by a supplier;

(12)

Take any retaliatory action against a wholesaler that files a complaint in good faith regarding an alleged violation by the supplier of federal, state, or local law or an administrative rule as a result of that complaint;

(13)

Require or prohibit any change in the manager or successor of any wholesaler who has been approved by the supplier as of or subsequent to January 31, 1991, unless the supplier acts in good faith. Should a wholesaler change an approved manager or successor manager, a supplier shall not require or prohibit the change unless the person selected by the wholesaler fails to meet the nondiscriminatory, material, and reasonable standards and qualifications for managers consistently applied to similarly situated wholesalers by the supplier. Provided, however, the supplier shall have the burden of proving that such person fails to meet such standards and qualifications;

(14)

Upon written notice of intent to transfer the wholesaler's business, interfere with, prevent, or unreasonably delay, not to exceed thirty (30) days, the transfer of the wholesaler's business if the proposed transferee is a designated member;

(15)

Upon written notice of intent to transfer the wholesaler's business other than to a designated member, withhold consent to or approval of, or unreasonably delay, not to exceed thirty (30) days after receipt of all material information reasonably requested, a response to a request by the wholesaler for any transfer of a wholesaler's business if the proposed transferee meets the nondiscriminatory, material, and reasonable qualifications and standards required by the supplier for similarly situated wholesalers; or

(16)

Restrict or inhibit the right of free association among wholesalers for any lawful purpose.

(b)

A successor becomes obligated under this section and under the terms and conditions of the agreement in effect on the date of succession regardless of the character or form of the succession.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 8, § 3; 1991, No. 866, § 3; 2015, No. 857, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment added (b).

3-5-1108. Compensation upon supplier's violation — Arbitration.

(a)

Except as provided for in this subchapter, a supplier that has amended, modified, cancelled, terminated, or refused to renew any agreement; or caused a wholesaler to resign from an agreement; or has interfered with, prevented, or unreasonably delayed, or, where required by this subchapter, has withheld or unreasonably delayed consent to or approval of, any assignment or transfer of a wholesaler's business, shall pay the wholesaler reasonable compensation for the diminished value of the wholesaler's business including any ancillary business which has been negatively affected by the act of the supplier. The value of the wholesaler's business or ancillary business shall include, but not be limited to, its good will. Provided, however, nothing contained in this subchapter shall give rise to a claim against the supplier or wholesaler by any proposed purchaser of a wholesaler's business.

(b)(1)(A)

Should either party, at any time, determine that mutual agreement on the amount of reasonable compensation cannot be reached, the supplier or the wholesaler may send by certifed mail, return receipt requested, written notice to the other party declaring its intention to proceed with arbitration.

(B)

Arbitration shall proceed only by mutual agreement of both parties.

(2)(A)

Not more than ten (10) business days after the notice to enter into arbitration has been delivered, the other party shall send written notice to the requesting party declaring its intention either to proceed or not to proceed with arbitration.

(B)

Should the other party fail to respond within ten (10) business days, it shall be conclusively presumed that said party shall have agreed to arbitration.

(3)

The matter of determining the amount of compensation may, by agreement of the parties, be submitted to a three-member arbitration panel consisting of one (1) representative selected by the supplier but unassociated with the affected supplier, one (1) wholesaler representative selected by the wholesaler but unassociated with the wholesaler; and an impartial arbitrator.

(4)(A)(i)

Not more than ten (10) business days after mutual agreement of both parties has been reached to arbitrate, each party shall designate, in writing, its one (1) arbitrator representative, and the party initiating arbitration shall request, in writing, a list of five (5) arbitrators from the American Arbitration Association or its successor and request that the list be mailed to each party by certified mail, return receipt requested.

(ii)

Not more than ten (10) business days after the receipt of the list of five (5) choices, the wholesaler arbitrator and the supplier arbitrator shall strike and disqualify up to two (2) names each from the list.

(B)

Should either party fail to respond within the ten (10) business days or should more than one (1) name remain after the strikes, the American Arbitration Association shall make the selection of the impartial arbitrator from the names not stricken from the list.

(5)(A)

Not more than thirty (30) days after the final selection of the arbitration panel is made, the arbitration panel shall convene to decide the dispute.

(B)

The panel shall conclude the arbitration within twenty (20) days after the arbitration panel convenes and shall render a decision by majority vote of the arbitrators within twenty (20) days from the conclusion of the arbitration.

(C)

The award of the arbitration panel shall be final and binding on the parties as to the amount of compensation for the diminished value.

(6)

The cost of the impartial arbitrator, the stenographer, and the meeting site shall be equally divided between the wholesaler and the supplier. All other costs shall be paid by the party incurring them.

(7)(A)(i)

After both parties have agreed to arbitrate, should either party, except by mutual agreement, fail to abide by the time limitations as prescribed in subdivisions (b)(2), (4), and (5) of this section, or fail or refuse to make the selection of any arbitrators, or fail to participate in the arbitration hearings, the other party shall make the selection of its arbitrators and proceed to arbitration.

(ii)

The party who has failed or refused to comply as prescribed in this section shall be considered to be in default.

(B)

Any party considered to be in default pursuant to this subsection shall have waived any and all rights the party would have had in the arbitration and shall be considered to have consented to the determination of the arbitration panel.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 8, § 7; 1991, No. 866, § 7.

3-5-1109. Prohibited acts by wholesaler.

A wholesaler shall not do any of the following:

(1)

Fail to devote such efforts and resources to the sale and distribution of all the supplier's brands of beer which the wholesaler has been granted the right to sell or distribute as are required in the wholesaler's agreement with the supplier;

(2)(A)

Sell or deliver beer to a retail licensee located outside the sales territory designated to the wholesaler by the supplier of a particular brand or brands of beer.

(B)(i)

Provided, however, during periods of temporary service interruptions impacting a particular sales territory, a supplier may appoint another wholesaler to service the sales territory during the period of temporary service interruption.

(ii)

A wholesaler who is designated to service the impacted sales territory during the period of temporary service interruption shall not be in violation of this subchapter and shall not have any of the rights provided under §§3-5-1108 and3-5-1111 with respect to the temporary service territory.

(3)(A)

Transfer the wholesaler's business without giving the supplier written notice of intent to transfer the wholesaler's business and, where required by this subchapter, receiving the supplier's approval for the proposed transfer.

(B)

Provided, consent or approval of the supplier shall not be required of any transfer of the wholesaler's business to a designated member, or of any transfer of less than ten percent (10%) of the wholesaler's business unless such transfer results in a change in control.

(C)

Provided, however, that the wholesaler shall give the supplier written notice of any change in ownership of the wholesaler.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 8, § 4; 1991, No. 866, § 4.

3-5-1110. Transfer of wholesaler's business — Interference prohibited.

(a)(1)(A)

Upon written notice of intent to transfer the wholesaler's business, any individual owning or deceased individual who owned an interest in a wholesaler may transfer the wholesaler's business to a designated member or to any other person who meets the nondiscriminatory, material, and reasonable qualifications and standards required by the supplier for similarly situated wholesalers.

(B)

The consent or approval of the supplier shall not be required of any transfer of the wholesaler's business, including the assignment of the wholesaler's rights under the agreement, to a designated member shall not be withheld or unreasonably delayed to a proposed transferee who meets such nondiscriminatory, material, and reasonable qualifications and standards.

(2)

Provided, such designated member or transferee shall in no event be qualified as a transferee without the written approval or consent of the supplier where such proposed transferee shall have been involved in any of the following:

(A)

Insolvency, filing of any voluntary or involuntary petition under any bankruptcy or receivership law, or execution of an assignment for the benefit of creditors;

(B)

Revocation or suspension of an alcoholic beverage license by the regulatory agency of the United States Government or any state, whereby service was interrupted for more than thirty-one (31) days;

(C)

Conviction of the proposed transferee or any owner thereof of a felony under the United States Code or the laws of any state which reasonably may adversely affect the good will or interest of the wholesaler or supplier; or

(D)

Had an agreement involuntarily terminated, cancelled, not renewed, or discontinued by a supplier for good cause.

(b)

The supplier shall not interfere with, prevent, or unreasonably delay the transfer of the wholesaler's business, including an assignment of wholesaler's rights under the agreement, if the proposed transferee is a designated member or if the transferee other than a designated member meets such nondiscriminatory, material and reasonable qualifications and standards required by the supplier for similarly situated wholesalers. Where the transferee is other than a designated member, the supplier may in good faith and for good cause related to the reasonable qualifications refuse to accept the transfer of the wholesaler's business or the assignment of the wholesaler's rights under the agreement.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 8, § 6; 1991, No. 866, § 6.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted in (b), the language “if the proposed transferee is other than a designated member” immediately preceded “or if the transferee other than a designated member meets such nondiscriminatory, material, and reasonable qualifications.”

3-5-1111. Conditions for modification of agreement.

(a)

Notwithstanding any agreement and except as otherwise provided for in this subchapter, a supplier shall not amend or modify an agreement, cause a wholesaler to resign from an agreement, or cancel, terminate, fail to renew, or refuse to continue under an agreement, unless the supplier has complied with all of the following:

(1)

Has satisfied the applicable notice requirements of this section;

(2)

Has acted in good faith; and

(3)

Has good cause for the amendment, modification, cancellation, termination, nonrenewal, discontinuance, or forced resignation.

(b)

For each amendment, modification, termination, cancellation, nonrenewal, or discontinuance, the supplier shall have the burden of proving:

(1)

That it has acted in good faith;

(2)

That the notice requirements under this section have been complied with; and

(3)

That there was good cause for the amendment, modification, termination, cancellation, nonrenewal, or discontinuance.

(c)(1)

Notwithstanding any agreement and except as otherwise provided in this section, and in addition to the time limits set forth in subdivision (d)(4) of this section, the supplier shall furnish written notice of the amendment, modification, termination, cancellation, nonrenewal, or discontinuance of an agreement to the wholesaler not less than thirty (30) days before the effective date of the amendment, modification, termination, cancellation, nonrenewal, or discontinuance.

(2)

The notice shall be by certified mail and shall contain all of the following:

(A)

A statement of intention to amend, modify, terminate, cancel, not renew, or discontinue the agreement;

(B)

A statement of the reason for the amendment, modification, termination, cancellation, nonrenewal, or discontinuance; and

(C)

The date on which the amendment, modification, termination, cancellation, nonrenewal, or discontinuance takes effect.

(d)

Notwithstanding any agreement, good cause shall exist for the purposes of a termination, cancellation, nonrenewal, or discontinuance under subdivision (a)(3) of this section when all of the following occur:

(1)

There is a failure by the wholesaler to comply with a provision of the agreement which is both reasonable and of material significance to the business relationship between the wholesaler and the supplier;

(2)

The supplier first acquired knowledge of the failure described in subdivision (d)(1) of this section not more than twenty-four (24) months before the date notification was given pursuant to subsection (c) of this section;

(3)

The wholesaler was given notice by the supplier of failure to comply with the agreement; and

(4)

The wholesaler has been afforded thirty (30) days in which to submit a plan of corrective action to comply with the agreement and an additional ninety (90) days to cure such noncompliance in accordance with the plan.

(e)

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (c) of this section, a supplier may terminate, cancel, fail to renew, or discontinue an agreement immediately upon written notice given in the manner and containing the information required by subsection (c) of this section, if any of the following occur:

(1)

Insolvency of the wholesaler, the filing of any petition by or against the wholesaler under any bankruptcy or receivership law, or the assignment for the benefit of creditors or dissolution or liquidation of the wholesaler which materially affects the wholesaler's ability to remain in business;

(2)

Revocation or suspension of the wholesaler's state or federal license by the appropriate regulatory agency whereby the wholesaler cannot service the wholesaler's sales territory for more than thirty-one (31) days;

(3)

The wholesaler, or a partner or an individual who owns ten percent (10%) or more of the partnership or stock of a corporate wholesaler, has been convicted of a felony under the United States Code or the laws of any state which reasonably may adversely affect the good will or interest of the wholesaler or supplier. However, an existing stockholder or stockholders, or partner or partners, or a designated member or members, shall have, subject to the provisions of this subchapter, the right to purchase the partnership interest or the stock of the offending partner or stockholder prior to the conviction of the offending partner or stockholder, and if the sale is completed prior to conviction the provisions of this subdivision (e)(3) shall not apply;

(4)

There was fraudulent conduct relating to a material matter on the part of the wholesaler in dealings with the supplier or its product. Provided, however, the supplier shall have the burden of proving fraudulent conduct relating to a material matter on the part of the wholesaler in any legal action challenging such termination;

(5)(A)

The wholesaler failed to confine to the designated sales territory its sales of a brand or brands to retailers.

(B)

Subdivision (e)(5)(A) of this section does not apply if there is a dispute between two (2) or more wholesalers as to the boundaries of the assigned territory and the boundaries cannot be determined by a reading of the description contained in the agreements between the supplier and the wholesalers;

(6)

A wholesaler has failed to pay for beer ordered and delivered in accordance with established terms and the wholesaler fails to make full payment within two (2) business days after receipt of written notice of the delinquency and demand for immediate payment from the supplier;

(7)

A wholesaler intentionally has made a transfer of the wholesaler's business, other than a transfer to a designated member without prior written notice to the supplier, and has failed, within thirty (30) days from the receipt of written notice from the supplier of its intent to terminate on the ground of such transfer, to reverse said transfer of the wholesaler's business;

(8)

A wholesaler intentionally has made a transfer of the wholesaler's business, other than a transfer to a designated member, although the wholesaler has prior to the transfer received from the supplier a timely notice of disapproval of the transfer in accordance with this subchapter; or

(9)

The wholesaler intentionally ceases to carry on business with respect to any of the supplier's brand or brands previously serviced by a wholesaler in its territory designated by the supplier, unless such cessation is due to force majeure or to labor dispute and the wholesaler has made good faith efforts to overcome such events. Provided, however, this shall affect only that brand or brands with respect to which the wholesaler ceased to carry on business.

(f)(1)

Notwithstanding subsections (a), (c), and (e) of this section, a supplier may terminate, cancel, not renew, or discontinue an agreement upon not less than thirty (30) days' prior written notice if the supplier discontinues production or discontinues distribution in this state of all the brands sold by the supplier to the wholesaler.

(2)

Provided, however, nothing in this section shall prohibit a supplier from:

(A)

Upon not less than thirty (30) days' notice, discontinuing the distribution of any particular brand or package of beer; or

(B)

Conducting test marketing of a new brand of beer which is not currently being sold in this state, provided that the supplier has notified the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division in writing of its plans to test market, which notice shall describe the market area in which the test shall be conducted, the name or names of the wholesaler or wholesalers who will be selling the beer, the name or names of the brand of beer being tested, and the period of time, not to exceed eighteen (18) months, during which the testing will take place.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 8, § 5; 1991, No. 866, § 5.

Subchapter 12

— Microbrewery-Restaurants

Effective Dates.

Acts 1999, No. 1065, § 6: Emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that present law is inadequate as it relates to the serving of alcoholic beverages at festivals; that this act clarifies that law; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible so that the benefits hereof will be available during the upcoming festival season. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 857, § 12: Mar. 31, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act is essential to the public interest and operation of the alcohol laws in the State of Arkansas; that this act eliminates conflicting language and allows consistent application of alcohol laws; that this act is immediately necessary due to the substantial growth and continued expansion of the brewing industry in Arkansas; that clear and consistent application of the law to the brewing industry is in the public’s immediate interest as is controlling the distribution of alcoholic beverages within the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-5-1201. Legislative determinations and intent.

(a)

The General Assembly reaffirms the policy of this state of strict enforcement of laws and rules applicable to the manufacture or sale of beer including, but not limited to, those establishing the three-tier distribution system with prohibitions against ownership and employment interests between the three (3) tiers, or the “three-tier system”.

(b)

The General Assembly determines:

(1)

That the tourist and the convention industries contribute substantially to the revenues of business enterprises in this state and that income from the tourist trade, conventions, and allied industries is essential to the continued well-being and prosperity of this state;

(2)

That there is extreme competition among states throughout the nation for the tourist and convention business; and

(3)

That all reasonable steps should be taken to retain, foster, and encourage this business and to create favorable competitive conditions therefor in this state.

(c)

In order to encourage tourists and conventions to come to Arkansas, it is essential that visitors to the state be provided accommodations, services, and facilities of a nature to which they are accustomed and competitive with those offered in other states and areas.

(d)

It is the intent and purpose of this subchapter to authorize the legal operation of microbrewery-restaurants as herein provided as a limited exception to the three-tier system.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 611, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 75.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a).